Arkansas, session 2025, SB470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-114(b)(5), concerning requirements a
public school that operates primarily as a virtual school and that
administers a statewide student assessment to a student in a virtual setting
must meet, is amended to read as follows:
(5)(A) An adult approved in accordance with terms established by
the public school that primarily operates as a virtual school and is
administering a statewide student assessment to a student in kindergarten
through grade eight (K-8) in a virtual setting, including without limitation
the student's parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to
the student, is physically present with the student for the duration of the
administration of the statewide student assessment.
*TNL172*
03/16/2025 11:05:09 AM TNL172

SB470
(B) An adult approved in accordance with terms established
by the public school that primarily operates as a virtual school and
administering a statewide student assessment to a student in grades nine
through twelve (9-12) in a virtual setting, including without limitation the
student's parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the
student, shall attest prior to the administration of an assessment to the
student in a virtual setting that the student and the approved adult shall
adhere to all current testing security protocols;




























03/16/2025 11:05:09 AM TNL172